public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
adintar/A
alear/A
inamorar/A
arbitrar/A
dexarmiđar/A
ativar/A
aver/A
badajar/A
baɉar/A
xbalar/A
xbalordir/A
baluxenar/A
bañar/A
dexbaraŧar/A
xbarlúxer/A
inbastir/A
batolar/A
inbavarar/A
xbekar/A
xberegar/A
xbetegar/A
xbiankeđar/A
inbilar/A
inbiondir/A
inbixakar/A
sobójer/A
rebokar/A
inbolsamar/A
abonbar/A
xborir/A
dexboskar/A
xbotonar/A
brakar/A
dexbramegar/A
xbratar/A
abreviar/A
xbriñar/A
dexbrokar/A
inbroxar/A
xbruxar/A
buratar/A
xbuxar/A
recamar/A
descavar/A
cèñer/A
inkoncéñer/A
skoncetar/A
incokar/A
dixdir/A
indanar/A
indentar/A
devastar/A
xdindolar/A
predíxer/A
indolŧir/A
doperar/A
indormir/A
dreŧar/A
dedúxer/A
đaltronar/A
dexđónxer/A
đugolar/A
efetuar/A
entuxiaxmar/A
estaxiar/A
exekrar/A
rarefar/A
fadar/A
falkar/A
fanfruñar/A
sfarinar/A
rinfaŧar/A
fortifegar/A
trafegar/A
sfenir/A
inferar/A
fermentar/A
infiar/A
fiapir/A
desfidar/A
filar/A
rafinar/A
infiorar/A
infisir/A
flosar/A
fogar/A
desfoɉar/A
infoñar/A
desformar/A
formigar/A
straforŧar/A
frakasar/A
sfrantumar/A
fraskeđar/A
parafraxar/A
refreskar/A
infrincar/A
sfroxar/A
fugar/A
profumar/A
fustegar/A
fuxilar/A
galiđar/A
ingamelar/A
xgangerar/A
ingarbir/A
xgargariđar/A
ingateɉar/A
ingetar/A
xgobar/A
paragonar/A
dexgoŧar/A
xgrafiñar/A
xgranar/A
dexgrankir/A
graŧiar/A
ingravidar/A
xgrénđer/A
grilar/A
xgriñolir/A
xgrongolar/A
ingrotir/A
xguanŧar/A
guarnir/A
gucar/A
dexgustar/A
idroxenar/A
induxiar/A
inɉuriar/A
inprexonar/A
insular/A
intrar/A
istansiar/A
exíɉer/A
dexɉaŧar/A
ɉestir/A
ɉoŧar/A
skacir/A
skaenar/A
inkalir/A
kalivar/A
kalomar/A
rekalŧitrar/A
kanar/A
kandidar/A
deskankarar/A
skansar/A
kantuŧar/A
deskapelar/A
deskapriŧiar/A
inkaratar/A
skargar/A
skarnevalar/A
inkartar/A
kasar/A
kastrar/A
inkatarigolar/A
inkatramar/A
kauŧionar/A
kavalar/A
akaxar/A
inkinar/A
inkodegar/A
deskoɉonar/A
skokonar/A
kolmar/A
skolpar/A
komodar/A
sokónber/A
konfutar/A
deskonpañar/A
konotar/A
kontentar/A
skontrar/A
kopar/A
perkórer/A
skoraɉir/A
inkorđar/A
skorniđar/A
kortiđar/A
kostumar/A
kovèrđer/A
krear/A
krestaliđar/A
kritegar/A
deskrosar/A
krostoliđar/A
rekuadrar/A
skuartar/A
kuèrđer/A
intrakuirar/A
rinkular/A
kuñir/A
kurvar/A
kúxer/A
langorir/A
lanŧar/A
xlargar/A
inlaŧar/A
xlavar/A
lekar/A
xlenguaŧar/A
lexenar/A
ligar/A
limegar/A
sublokar/A
stralosar/A
lungar/A
inmagarar/A
xmaltir/A
xmaniar/A
remarkar/A
inmarŧir/A
mastegar/A
maxarar/A
trameđar/A
menestrar/A
remeritar/A
traméter/A
ministrar/A
remodernar/A
moltiplegar/A
stramontar/A
morbinar/A
mostar/A
mudar/A
remurkiar/A
xmuxegar/A
navegar/A
xnetar/A
dexnonbolar/A
xñanfar/A
odiar/A
olsar/A
operar/A
orixenar/A
ovatar/A
padroniđar/A
inpalar/A
palpuñar/A
panteđar/A
reparar/A
inpartir/A
sorpasar/A
despatar/A
inspaŧientar/A
inpegar/A
inpelumar/A
inpenelar/A
despeñar/A
spernacar/A
konpèter/A
repeŧar/A
piànđer/A
pikar/A
spiolar/A
inpirolar/A
piŧegar/A
poder/A
pomar/A
sotopóner/A
strapontar/A
popolar/A
inposesar/A
inpotifar/A
reprénder/A
priar/A
protokolar/A
spupilar/A
rabir/A
rajar/A
arankar/A
raskiar/A
reditar/A
arestar/A
rigar/A
rodar/A
derokir/A
rónper/A
rovegar/A
ruinar/A
insabiar/A
konsakrar/A
asaltar/A
sanɉutar/A
desavir/A
insear/A
rasekurar/A
suseguitar/A
semenar/A
resentir/A
serar/A
insestar/A
konsiderar/A
sindikar/A
skajar/A
iskarpiar/A
iskeletrar/A
skoar/A
skriŧolar/A
skuriar/A
soleɉar/A
insonolir/A
sortir/A
sparlacar/A
desperar/A
spicar/A
ispiritar/A
springar/A
stafar/A
stanpar/A
instekar/A
stipular/A
stokar/A
stralar/A
stríder/A
strukolar/A
stuđar/A
suefar/A
supiar/A
tabular/A
takir/A
tanbaskar/A
intardegar/A
tastiđar/A
tediar/A
sotinténder/A
tentar/A
ateñir/A
inkontèñer/A
retéñer/A
interŧar/A
timonar/A
stironar/A
tolerar/A
topar/A
torniar/A
tostar/A
strabukar/A
stranŧir/A
traŧar/A
istremir/A
trikolar/A
tronbiđar/A
intuir/A
inŧakolar/A
interŧéder/A
inŧeñar/A
deŧervelar/A
ŧigolar/A
ŧirkondar/A
ŧukarar/A
urlar/A
stravakar/A
xvanir/A
revardar/A
provéder/A
revelir/A
xventar/A
kontraveñir/A
intervèñer/A
vergolar/A
versar/A
vesigar/A
dexviar/A
vínŧer/A
vixilar/A
vogar/A
involđar/A
skonvòlxer/A
xàser/A
xbravar/A
inxeñatolar/A
xirandolar/A
xñakar/A
dexunar/A
